Utah statutes.
64-13-21.2.   Offender supervision dedicated credits.
All money received from the monthly supervision fee established in Subsection
64-13-21(3) shall be deposited in the General Fund as a parole and probation
dedicated credit and shall be used to cover costs incurred in the collection
of the fee and in the development of offender supervision programs.
